Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Legislative Auditing

7.310.
Intent and purpose of law.

The intent of KRS

7.310

to

7.380

is to insure systematic and thorough evaluations of agencies of the state government and their various programs for the purpose of furnishing the Legislature with factual information necessary to the discharge of its legislative duties. The General Assembly finds that adequate information is not available for each session through which the members of the Legislature can determine the needs of the various agencies and departments of the state government, and the effectiveness of their programs. The General Assembly also finds that the legislative session is not adequate time in which to review the financial operations of each agency. It is the intent of KRS

7.310

to

7.380

to provide the Legislature with adequate factual information by which to exercise its valid powers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 42, § 1; 1974, ch. 384, § 1.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

This is former KRS

6.360

as amended, renumbered by the Reviser of Statutes in 1974.

7.320.
Powers and duties of the Commission.

The Legislative Research Commission or a subcommittee authorized by it shall study and examine expenditures of state agencies. To facilitate optimum effectiveness and economy in the performance of this function, the Legislative Research Commission or a committee or subcommittee authorized by it, shall employ electronic data processing equipment including computers and other necessary support equipment capable of providing read only access to the desired expenditure records. The Commission may organize and adopt rules for the conduct of its business and do whatever else it considers necessary or advisable to carry out the purposes of KRS

7.310

to

7.380

.

The Commission may adopt rules and prescribe procedures for the conduct of its affairs.

The Commission or any member thereof or any employee duly authorized by the Commission or the co-chairmen thereof may administer oaths, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, and have the deposition of witnesses taken in the manner prescribed by law for taking depositions in civil actions. If a person disobeys or refuses to comply with a subpoena, or if a witness refuses to testify to a matter regarding which he may be lawfully interrogated, the Franklin Circuit Court may on application of the Commission compel obedience by proceedings for contempt in the same manner as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from the court or a refusal to testify in the court. Each witness who appears before the Commission by its order, other than an officer or employee of the state, is entitled to the fees and mileage provided for witnesses in civil cases in courts of record, which shall be audited and paid upon the presentation of proper vouchers sworn to by such witnesses and approved by the co-chairmen of the Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 42, § 3; 1970, ch. 92, § 2; 1974, ch. 384, § 3; 1978, ch. 384, § 533, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 111, § 167, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 131, § 3, effective July 13, 1984.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1984). This section was amended by two 1984 Acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

This is former KRS

6.370

as amended, renumbered by the Reviser of Statutes in 1974.

7.330.
Audit or investigation of financial records — Review and evaluation of state-supported programs.

The Commission may:

Perform an audit or investigation of any accounts, books and other financial records of the state government, or of any officer, department, board, bureau, institution, commission, agency, or other unit, of the state;

Examine and audit any fiscal books, records and accounts of custodians of public funds, and of disbursing officers of the state, making independent verification of all assets, liabilities, revenues and expenditures of the state and agencies of the state;

Review and evaluate any program supported in whole or in part by state appropriation. In any instance in which a program review indicates inadequate operating or administrative system controls or procedures, inaccuracies, waste, extravagance, unauthorized or unintended activities or programs, or other deficiencies, the Commission may report its findings to the General Assembly;

Perform audit of any agency, private or semiprivate agency or organization receiving state funds and review audits of such agencies to ascertain that recommendations are implemented within sixty (60) days after issuance of the final audit report under KRS 43.090(1); such reviews may be made by the appropriate interim committee as determined by the Commission;

The Commission may, at any time, study or review any matter relative to program activities of any state department, agency, or institution;

Require the assistance of any executives and officials, auditors, accountants, and other employees of any agency at any time in the inspection, examination and audit of books, accounts and records.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 42, § 7; 1968, ch. 152, § 1; 1974, ch. 384, § 5; 1982, ch. 176, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

This is former KRS

6.380

as amended, renumbered by the Reviser of Statutes in 1974.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS

156.265

and this section should be interpreted to allow both the state committee and the commission to authorize local school district audits consistent with their statutory authority and that such interpretation is both logical, reasonable and consistent with the apparent intent of the legislature as evidenced by the words of the statute.

OAG 89-29

.

The auditor of public accounts may audit local school districts on behalf of the Legislative Research Commission when so directed by the Legislative Research Commission in fulfillment of its statutory powers pursuant to this section.

OAG 89-29

.

7.340.
Special reviews requested by members of General Assembly, granted when.

A member of the General Assembly may, by written request and by written notice of at least six (6) days, request the Commission to direct a special review of any state agency, unit or program. Upon the vote of the majority of the Commission approving the request, the director of the Legislative Research Commission shall cause such review to be made.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 42, § 12; 1974, ch. 384, § 7.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

This is former KRS

6.390

as amended, renumbered by the Reviser of Statutes in 1974.

7.350.
Reports of Commission — Annual report.

The Commission shall file copies of its approved reports together with the Commission’s recommendations. The Commission shall file an annual report not later than December 1. Each annual report shall be open to public inspection after it is filed by the Legislative Research Commission, except that any portion of the annual report containing recommendations, comments, and narrative statement shall be released only upon the approval of a majority vote of the Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 42, § 10; 1974, ch. 384, § 8.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

This is former KRS

6.395

as amended, renumbered by the Reviser of Statutes in 1974.

7.360.
Audit of public bank accounts.

In the course of its investigations and studies, the Commission may ascertain the amount on deposit in any bank belonging to the agency audited, and may audit the account on the books of the bank. No bank is liable for making available to the Commission any of the information required under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 42, § 8; 1974, ch. 384, § 10.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

This is former KRS

6.405

as amended, renumbered by the Reviser of Statutes in 1974.

7.370.
Records — Copies of reports.

The Legislative Research Commission shall keep a complete, accurate and adequate set of fiscal transactions and shall keep a complete file of copies of all audit reports, examinations, investigations, and other reports or releases issued by the Commission and a complete file of audit work papers and other evidence pertaining to the work of the Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 42, § 13; 1974, ch. 384, § 11.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

This is former KRS

6.410

as amended, renumbered by the Reviser of Statutes in 1974.

7.380.
Confidentiality of information.

KRS

7.310

to

7.380

do not authorize or permit the publication of information prohibited by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 42, § 9; 1974, ch. 384, § 12.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

This is former KRS

6.415

as amended, renumbered by the Reviser of Statutes in 1974.